New Jersey, session 222, S1114.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Notwithstanding any other law or regulation to the contrary, any mail-in ballot that is sent to a qualified voter and that is returned to the county clerk as undeliverable and forwarded to the commissioner of registration shall be compiled by the commissioner and noted in the Statewide voter registration system following any election in the State.  The commissioner of registration shall place any voter whose mail-in ballot was returned as undeliverable into the inactive file.  If a voter placed in the inactive file, pursuant to this subsection, fails to vote in two consecutive federal general elections, the commissioner of registration shall take the necessary steps to remove the voter from the Statewide voter registration system and transfer the voter to the deleted file, pursuant to the provisions of R.S.19:31-19. The commissioner of registration shall retain, for two years, all mail-in ballots returned as undeliverable. b.    The commissioner of registration shall send a notice to a mail-in ballot voter, no more than five days following: (1)   the voters placement in the inactive file; (2)   the commissioners decision to take the necessary steps to remove the voter from the Statewide voter registration system; and (3)   the voters removal from the Statewide voter registration system and transfer to the deleted file. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.